Massachusetts, session 194th, H4370.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 221 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out section 88 and inserting in place thereof the following
section:-
Section 88. Upon request of the presiding justice or any party, the transcriber shall
furnish a transcript of their notes or audio recording, or any part thereof, taken at a trial or
hearing, for which they shall be paid by the party requesting it at the rate of $4.50 per page for
the original and $1.50 per page for each copy ordered. If requested by a party, the transcriber
shall furnish an electronic reproduction at an amount not to exceed $7.50 for each electronic
reproduction requested. All electronic reproductions shall be in an open-source format as
specified by the office of transcription services. Copies, if so requested by an indigent person or
counsel for an indigent person, shall be paid at $.15 per page. In the event that a rush transcript is
ordered by the presiding justice or any party, the rate shall be $6.75 per page for the original and
$2.25 per page for each copy; provided that, if requested by a party, the transcriber shall furnish
an electronic reproduction at an amount not to exceed $7.50 for each electronic reproduction;
of 2

and provided further, that copies, if so requested by an indigent person or counsel for an indigent
person, shall be paid at $.23 per page. If a transcript is ordered by the presiding justice or, in a
criminal case, by the district attorney, payment therefor shall be made at the same rate by the
administrative office of the trial court upon a voucher approved by the presiding justice and, in a
criminal case, the charges for transcripts furnished to a justice and to the district attorney shall be
taxed like other expenses. If the presiding justice orders that a statement given to the police be
transcribed, all parties shall receive a copy and payment therefor shall be made at the same rate
by the administrative office of the trial court upon a voucher approved by the presiding justice.
of 2